output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_KomboLatinicaKirilica.dic
lgati/Jt
maly/Ju
kaky-nebud/Jv
morje/Jw
moh/Jx
natolkti/Jy
pekti/Jy
ktory-nebud/Jv
hotěti/Jz
odpověděti/KA
diavol/KB
sěkti/Jy
posol/KB
vlěkti/Jy
polje/Jw
pověděti/KA
rěkti/Jy
prěsěkti/Jy
tekti/Jy
protekti/Jy
utekti/Jy
upekti/Jy
iztekti/Jy
prětekti/Jy
htěti/Jz
prědpověděti/KA
věděti/KA
posěkti/Jy
slgati/Jt
stekti/Jy
izsěkti/Jy
dověděti/KA
izrěkti/Jy
odrěkti/Jy
prěrěkti/Jy
urěkti/Jy
zarěkti/Jy
proiztekti/Jy
izpověděti/KA
oblěkti/Jy
odvlěkti/Jy
privlěkti/Jy
izpekti/Jy
iztolkti/Jy
izvlěkti/Jy
narěkti/Jy
nasěkti/Jy
navlěkti/Jy
obsěkti/Jy
odsěkti/Jy
odtekti/Jy
raztekti/Jy
raztolkti/Jy
tolkti/Jy
ščigol/KB
povlěkti/Jy
